Utah statutes.
11-38-302.   Use of money in program -- Criteria -- Administration.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), the commission may authorize the use of money
in the program, by grant, to:
(a)  a local entity;
(b)  the Department of Natural Resources created under Section 79-2-201;
(c)  the Department of Agriculture and Food created under Section 4-2-1; or
(d)  a charitable organization that qualifies as being tax exempt under
Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) (a)  The money in the program shall be used for preserving or restoring
open land and agricultural land.
(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b)(ii), money from the program
may not be used to purchase a fee interest in real property in order to
preserve open land or agricultural land, but may be used to establish a
conservation easement under Title 57, Chapter 18, Land Conservation Easement
Act, or to fund similar methods to preserve open land or agricultural land.
(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(b)(i), money from the fund may be used to
purchase a fee interest in real property to preserve open land or agricultural
land if:
(A)  the parcel to be purchased is no more than 20 acres in size; and
(B)  with respect to a parcel purchased in a county in which over 50% of the
land area is publicly owned, real property roughly equivalent in size and
located within that county is contemporaneously transferred to private
ownership from the governmental entity that purchased the fee interest in real
property.
(iii)  Eminent domain may not be used or threatened in connection with any
purchase using money from the program.
(iv)  A parcel of land larger than 20 acres in size may not be divided into
separate parcels smaller than 20 acres each to meet the requirement of
Subsection (2)(b)(ii).
(c)  A local entity, department, or organization under Subsection (1) may not
receive money from the program unless it provides matching funds equal to or
greater than the amount of money received from the program.
(d)  In granting money from the program, the commission may impose conditions
on the recipient as to how the money is to be spent.
(e)  The commission shall give priority to requests from the Department of
Natural Resources for up to 20% of each annual increase in the amount of money
in the program if the money is used for the protection of wildlife or
watershed.
(f) (i)  The commission may not make a grant from the program that exceeds
$1,000,000 until after making a report to the Legislative Management Committee
about the grant.
(ii)  The Legislative Management Committee may make a recommendation to the
commission concerning the intended grant, but the recommendation is not
binding on the commission.
(3)  In determining the amount and type of financial assistance to provide an
entity, department, or organization under Subsection (1) and subject to
Subsection (2)(f), the commission shall consider:
(a)  the nature and amount of open land and agricultural land proposed to be
preserved or restored;
(b)  the qualities of the open land and agricultural land proposed to be
preserved or restored;
(c)  the cost effectiveness of the project to preserve or restore open land or
agricultural land;
(d)  the funds available;
(e)  the number of actual and potential applications for financial assistance
and the amount of money sought by those applications;
(f)  the open land preservation plan of the local entity where the project is
located and the priority placed on the project by that local entity;
(g)  the effects on housing affordability and diversity; and
(h)  whether the project protects against the loss of private property
ownership.
(4)  If a local entity, department, or organization under Subsection (1) seeks
money from the program for a project whose purpose is to protect critical
watershed, the commission shall require that the needs and quality of that
project be verified by the state engineer.
(5)  Each interest in real property purchased with money from the program
shall be held and administered by the state or a local entity.
